Utah statutes.
41-12a-410.   Employee and family relationships.
Whenever any person required to give proof of owner's or operator's security
is an operator in the employ of any owner, or is a member of the immediate
family or household of the owner, the department shall accept proof of
security by the owner in lieu of proof by the employee, family, or household
member.  The department shall indicate by restriction on the operator's
license the vehicles the operator may operate on the basis of that proof of
security.
